Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1106
Formation of jury; applicability of law.

The general mode of summoning, impaneling, challenging and swearing the jury is not changed by this code.

R.S.1867, Code § 282, p. 441;

R.S.1913, § 7845;

C.S.1922, § 8789;

C.S.1929, § 20-1106;

R.S.1943, § 25-1106.

Peremptory challenges and challenges for cause are provided to safeguard constitutional right of trial by jury in criminal case. Oden v. State, 166 Neb. 729, 90 N.W.2d 356 (1958).

In examination of venireman upon voir dire, he will not be deemed to have deceived counsel as to relations with opposing counsel, when he admits relations and answers questions truthfully. Blakely v. Omaha & C. B. St. Ry. Co., 94 Neb. 119, 142 N.W. 525 (1913).

Error cannot be predicated upon overruling of challenge to juror for cause when record does not show that complaining party has exhausted all his peremptory challenges. Olmstead v. Noll, 82 Neb. 147, 117 N.W. 102 (1908).

That juror has served on another case growing out of same state of facts does not necessarily disqualify him. Granite State Fire Ins. Co. v. Buckstaff Bros. Mfg. Co., 53 Neb. 123, 73 N.W. 544 (1897).

The improper excusing of a juror will not work a reversal unless all peremptory challenges are used. Smith v. Meyers, 52 Neb. 70, 71 N.W. 1006 (1897).

Selection of talesmen is entrusted to the discretion of the sheriff. Pflueger v. State, 46 Neb. 493, 64 N.W. 1094 (1895).